Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 1. Potato Board Membership and Authority.

§ 3.2-1800.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Approved seed potatoes”
means disease-free potatoes and parts thereof that conform to the standards established by the Potato Board.

“Board”
means the Potato Board.

“Handler”
means any person who is a processor, dealer, shipper, or exporter who purchases potatoes from a grower, or who acts as the grower’s agent, or any person who holds a produce dealer or commission merchant license from the Department. The term also means any producer who packs, processes, or otherwise performs the functions of a handler pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

“Jurisdiction”
means any locality where potatoes are produced according to the records of the Department.

“Potatoes”
means all varieties of potatoes except sweet potatoes.

“Producer”
means any person who, in a calendar year, grows a minimum of 40,000 pounds of potatoes in the Commonwealth.

“Seed potatoes”
means potatoes and parts thereof intended for the propagation or production of commercial potatoes.

History.

1982, c. 126, §§ 3.1-684.21, 3.1-684.39; 2008, c. 860; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 24 provides: “That all regulations, rules, and standards adopted by the Seed Potato Board pursuant to Chapter 41 (§

3.2-4100

et seq.) of Title 3.2 of the Code of Virginia that are in effect as of July 1, 2012, shall be administered by the Potato Board and shall remain in full force and effect until the Potato Board adopts regulations pursuant to the 22nd enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 25 provides: “That the gubernatorial appointees to the Potato Board holding office on July 1, 2012, shall continue to serve until such time as the existing terms might expire or become renewed.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 22, are identical, and added the definitions for “Approved seed potatoes,” “Board,” and “Seed potatoes.”

§ 3.2-1801.
Potato Board; composition and appointment of members.

The Potato Board, established by the passage of a 1994 referendum held pursuant to Chapter 126 of the Acts of Assembly of 1982, is continued within the Department. The Potato Board shall be composed of seven members appointed by the Governor from nominations by grower organizations, to terms of four years. The appointments shall be subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. All members of the Potato Board shall be producers of potatoes. Each grower organization shall submit nominations for each available position before the expiration of the member’s term for which the nomination is being provided. If said organizations fail to provide nominations, the Governor may appoint other nominees that meet the criteria provided by this section.

History.

1982, c. 126, § 3.1-684.32; 1985, c. 448; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 691, 714; 2016, c. 565; 2022, cc. 576, 577.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 691 and 714, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act providing for (i) staggered terms for board, council, or commission members and (ii) two-year terms for chairmen appointed by the Governor shall not affect current members or chairmen whose terms have not expired as of July 1, 2011.”

Acts
2022, cc. 576 and
577, cl. 3 provides: “That, beginning July 1, 2022, the term of any member appointed to the Potato Board pursuant to
§

3.2-1801

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, that is set to expire on June 20 shall be extended to June 30 of that year. Thereafter, all appointments shall be for terms of four years.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 691 and 714 are identical, and added the last two sentences.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 565 substituted “Acts of Assembly of 1982” for “1982 Acts of Assembly,” deleted
“two or more” following “organization shall submit,” “at least 90 days” following “available position,” and “at least 90 days before such expiration” following “provide nominations.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 576 and 577 are identical, and substituted “by grower organizations, to terms of four years. The appointments shall be subject” for “by grower organizations, the appointments to be subject.”

§ 3.2-1802.
Repealed by Acts 2016, c. 565, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

3.2-1802

, relating to the Potato Board membership terms, was derived from Acts 1982, c. 126, § 3.1-684.32; 1985, c. 448; 2008, c. 860; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

§ 3.2-1803.
Potato Board meetings and quorum.

The Potato Board shall meet at least once each year prior to the beginning of the seed potato buying season, at the call of the chairman, and whenever the majority of the members so request. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum.

History.

1982, c. 126, § 3.1-684.32; 1985, c. 448; 2008, c. 860; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2016, c. 565.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 22, are identical, and deleted “Potato” preceding “Board” in subsection A; rewrote subsection B, which read: “Members of the Potato Board may be reimbursed for expenses incurred in connection with their attendance at regular or special meetings of the Potato Board”; and added subsection C.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 565 deleted subsection A pertaining to election of chairman and officers and subsection B pertaining to compensation of board members and deleted the subsection C designation at the beginning.

§ 3.2-1804.
Powers and duties of the Potato Board.

The Board shall have charge of the management and expenditures of the Virginia Potato Fund established in the state treasury.

The Board may expend funds to provide for programs of research, education, publicity, advertising, and other promotion; manage the fund so as to accumulate a reserve for contingencies; establish an office and employ such technical and professional assistants as may be required; contract for research, publicity, advertising and other promotional services; and take all actions as will assist in strengthening and promoting the best interest of producers of potatoes.

In carrying out the purposes of this chapter, the Board may cooperate with other state, regional, and national agricultural organizations in research, education, publicity, advertising, and other promotional activities.

The Board may establish an executive committee and charge it with those powers, duties, and functions as the Board deems proper.

The chairman of the Board shall make an annual report to the Board including a statement of the total receipts and disbursements for the year and shall file a copy of the report and the audit required by §

3.2-1810

with the Commissioner.

The Board shall adopt regulations to establish standards for seed potatoes and to carry out the provisions of this chapter and, at the recommendation of the chairman, request that the Commissioner, the Dean of the College of Agriculture and Life Sciences at Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University, the Chairman of the Certified Seed Board, and the Director of the Eastern Shore Agricultural Research and Extension Center at Painter appoint representatives to advise the Board.

History.

1982, c. 126, §§ 3.1-684.32, 3.1-684.36; 1985, c. 448; 2008, c. 860; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 22, are identical, and throughout the section deleted “Potato” preceding “Board”; and added subsection F.